Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 7 Commercial Fertilizer

2-7-1.
Title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Rhode Island Commercial Fertilizer Law”.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 168, § 2.

2-7-2.
Responsibility for administration.

This chapter is administered by the director of the department of environmental management, referred to as the “director”.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 168, § 2.

2-7-3.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter:

“Brand” means a term, design, or trademark used in connection with one or several grades of commercial fertilizer.

“Bulk fertilizer” means a commercial fertilizer distributed in non-package form.

“Commercial fertilizer” means any substance containing one or more recognized plant nutrient(s) that is used for its plant nutrient content and that is designed for use or claimed to have value in promoting plant growth, except unmanipulated animal and
vegetable manures, marl, lime, limestone, wood ashes and gypsum, and other products exempted by regulation of the director.

“Director” means director of the department of environmental management or his or her authorized agent.

“Distributor” means any person who imports, consigns, manufactures, produces, compounds, mixes, or blends commercial fertilizer, or who offers for sale, sells, barters, or otherwise supplies commercial fertilizer in this state.

“Fertilizer material” means a commercial fertilizer that either:

Contains important quantities of no more than one of the primary plant nutrients (nitrogen, phosphoric acid, and potash); or

Has approximately eighty-five percent (85%) of its plant nutrient content present in the forms of a single chemical compound; or

Is derived from a plant or animal residue or by-product or a natural, material deposit that has been processed in a way that its content or primary plant nutrients has not been materially changed except by purification and concentration.

“Grade” means the percentage of total nitrogen, available phosphorus or phosphoric acid, and soluble potassium or soluble potash stated in whole numbers in the same terms, order, and percentages as in the guaranteed analysis. Specialty fertilizers may
be guaranteed in fractional units of less than one percent (1%) of total nitrogen, available phosphorus or phosphoric acid, and soluble potassium or soluble potash; provided, that fertilizer materials, bone meal, manures, and similar
raw materials may be guaranteed in fractional units.

“Guaranteed analysis” means:

Until the director prescribes the alternative form of guaranteed analysis in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (7)(ii) of this section, the term “guaranteed analysis” shall mean the minimum percentage of plant nutrients claimed in the following
order and form:

Total Nitrogen (N) . . . . . percent

Available Phosphoric Acid (P2O5) . . . . . percent

Soluble Potash (K2O) . . . . . percent

For unacidulated mineral phosphatic materials and basic slag, bone, tankage, and other organic phosphate materials, the total phosphoric acid and/or degree or fineness may also be guaranteed.

Guarantees for plant nutrients, other than nitrogen, phosphorus, and potassium, may be permitted or required by regulation of the director. The guarantees for these other nutrients shall be expressed in the form of the element. The sources of these other
nutrients (oxides, salt, chelates, etc.) may be required to be stated on the application for registration and may be included as a parenthetical statement on the label. Other beneficial substances or compounds,
determinable by laboratory methods, also may be guaranteed by permission of the director, and with the advice of the dean of the College of the Environment and Life Sciences at the University of Rhode Island. When
any plant nutrients or other substances or compounds are guaranteed, they shall be subject to inspection and analysis in accord with the methods and regulations prescribed by the director.

Potential basicity or acidity expressed in terms of calcium carbonate equivalent in multiples of one hundred (100) pounds per ton, when required by regulation.

When the director finds, after a public hearing following due notice, that the requirement for expressing the guaranteed analysis of phosphorus and potassium in elemental form would not impose an economic hardship on distributors and users of fertilizer
by reason of conflicting labeling requirements among the states, the director may require, by regulation, that the “guaranteed analysis” shall be in the following form:

Provided, however, that the effective date of the regulation shall be not less than six (6) months following the issuance of this regulation and provided further, that for a period of two (2) years following the effective date of the regulation, the equivalent
of phosphorus and potassium may also be shown in the form of phosphoric acid and potash; provided, however, that after the effective date of a regulation issued under the provisions of this section, requiring that phosphorus
and potassium shall constitute the grade.

“Investigational allowance” means an allowance for variations inherent in the taking, preparation and analysis of an official sample of commercial fertilizer.

“Label” means the display of all written, printed, or graphic matter upon the immediate container or statement accompanying a commercial fertilizer.

“Labeling” means all written, printed, or graphic matter, upon or accompanying any commercial fertilizer, or advertisements, brochures, posters, television, and radio announcements used in promoting the sale of commercial fertilizers.

“Mixed fertilizer” means a commercial fertilizer containing any combination or mixture of fertilizer materials.

“Official sample” means any sample of commercial fertilizer taken by the director or his or her agent and designated as “official” by the director.

“Percent” or “percentage” means the percentage by weight.

“Person” includes individual, partnership, association, firm, and corporation.

“Registrant” means the person who registers commercial fertilizer under the provisions of this chapter.

“Specialty fertilizer” means a commercial fertilizer distributed primarily for non-farm use, such as home gardens, lawns, shrubbery, flowers, golf courses, municipal parks, cemeteries, greenhouses, and nurseries.

“Ton” means a net weight of two thousand (2,000) pounds avoirdupois.

Total Nitrogen (N)percent Available Phosphorus (P)percent Soluble Potassium (K)percent

Click to view

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 168, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 2, § 38.

2-7-4.
Registration.

Each brand and grade of commercial fertilizer shall be registered by the manufacturer or by that person whose name appears upon the label before being distributed in this state. The application for registration shall be submitted to the director on a
form furnished by the director, and shall be accompanied by a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) per brand or grade registered.

All revenues received from registration fees shall be deposited as general revenues.

All applications for registration shall be accompanied by a label or true copy of the label.

Upon approval by the director, a copy of the registration shall be furnished to the applicant.

All registrations expire on December 31 of each year.

The application shall include the following information:

The brand and grade;

The guaranteed analysis; and

The name and address of the registrant.

A distributor is not required to register any commercial fertilizer that is already registered under this chapter by another person, providing the label does not differ in any respect.

A distributor is not required to register each grade of commercial fertilizer formulated according to specifications that are furnished by a consumer prior to mixing.

The plant nutrient content of each and every brand and grade of commercial fertilizer must remain uniform for the period of registration.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 168, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 349, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 22, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

2-7-5.
Labels.

Any commercial fertilizer distributed in this state in containers must have on or affixed to the container a label setting forth in clearly legible and conspicuous form the net weight and the information required by §

2-7-4 (a)(5)(i)

, (ii) and (iii) of this chapter.

In case of bulk shipments, this information, in written or printed form, shall accompany delivery and be supplied to the purchaser at the time of delivery.

A commercial fertilizer formulated according to specifications furnished by a consumer prior to mixing shall be labeled to show the net weight, guaranteed analysis, and the name and address of the distributor.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 168, § 2.

2-7-6.
Tonnage reports, tonnage fees.

There shall be paid to the department of environmental management for all commercial fertilizers distributed in this state a tonnage fee at the rate of fifteen cents (15¢) per ton: provided, that sales or exchanges between manufacturers are exempted.
Tonnage fees of less than one dollar ($1.00) are waived. All registration and tonnage fees received by the director under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited into the general fund as general revenue.

Every person who distributes a commercial fertilizer in this state shall file with the director, on forms furnished by the director, an annual tonnage report, under oath, for the twelve (12) month period ending June 30th. The report shall set forth the
net tons of each grade of commercial fertilizer distributed in this state during the twelve (12) month period.

The tonnage report and tonnage fee are due on or before July 15th following the close of the annual period. The tonnage fee is at the rate stated in subsection (a).

If the tonnage report is not filed and/or the tonnage fee not made on or before August 1st, following the close of the annual period, a collection fee amounting to ten percent (10%) (ten dollars ($10.00) minimum) of the amount shall be assessed against
the registrant, and the amount of fees due shall constitute a debt and become the basis of a judgment against the registrant. The director, however, in his or her discretion, may grant a reasonable extension of time. No information
furnished the director under this section shall be disclosed in a way as to divulge the operation of any person.

When more than one person is involved in the distribution of a commercial fertilizer, the last person who has the fertilizer registered and who distributes to a non-registrant (dealer or consumer) is responsible for reporting and paying the tonnage fee,
unless the report and payment is made by a prior distributor of a fertilizer.

All moneys for the commercial fertilizer program shall be made available to the director for the following purposes:

To support the feed and fertilizer testing laboratory for the testing and analysis of commercial fertilizers distributed within this state for the expressed purpose of detection of deficiency; and

For payment of ancillary services, personnel and equipment incurred in order to carry out the purposes of quality assurance defined by this chapter.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 168, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 349, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 1.

2-7-7.
Inspection, sampling, analysis.

It is the duty of the director, who may act through his or her authorized agent, to sample, inspect, make analysis of, and test commercial fertilizers distributed within this state at any time and place and to the extent the director deems necessary to
determine whether commercial fertilizers are in compliance with the provisions of this chapter. The director, individually or through his or her agent, is authorized to enter upon any public or private premises or carriers during
regular business hours in order to have access to commercial fertilizers subject to the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations pertaining to this chapter, and to the records relating to their distribution.

The methods of analysis and sampling are those adopted by the fertilizer quality testing laboratory in consultation with the director from sources such as the journal of the association of official analytical chemists.

The director, in determining for administrative purposes whether any commercial fertilizer is deficient in plant food, shall be guided solely by the official sample as defined in §

2-7-3(13)

and obtained and analyzed as provided for in subsection (a).

The results of official analysis of commercial fertilizers and portions of official samples shall be distributed upon request by the dean of the college of resource development at the University of Rhode Island as provided in the regulations.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 168, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 349, § 1.

2-7-8.
Plant food deficiency.

Penalty for nitrogen, available phosphoric acid or phosphorus and potash or potassium. If the analysis shows that a commercial fertilizer is deficient:

In one or more of its guaranteed primary plant foods (NPK) beyond the “investigational allowances” as established by regulation; or

If the overall index value of the fertilizer is below the level established by regulations, a penalty of three (3) times the commercial value of the deficiency or deficiencies shall be assessed

When a commercial fertilizer is subject to a penalty under both subdivisions (1) and (2), the larger penalty shall apply.

Penalty for other deficiencies. Deficiencies beyond the investigational allowances as established by regulation in any other constituent(s) covered under §

2-7-3(8)(i)(B)

, (C) and (D), which the registrant is required to or may guarantee, shall be evaluated and penalties prescribed for these deficiencies by the director.

Nothing contained in this section shall prevent any person from appealing to a court of competent jurisdiction praying for judgment as to the justification of any penalties assessed under this section.

All penalties assessed under this section shall be paid to the consumer of the lot of commercial fertilizer, one ton minimum, represented by the sample analyzed within three (3) months after the date of notice from the director to the registrant, receipts
taken for the penalties assessed and promptly forwarded to the consumer. If the consumers cannot be found, or the consumer was in possession of less than one ton of commercial fertilizer represented by the sample analyzed, the
amount of penalty shall be deposited into the fertilizer quality testing fund.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 168, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 349, § 1.

2-7-9.
Commercial value.

For the purpose of determining the commercial value to be applied under the provisions of §

2-7-8

, the director shall determine and publish annually the values per unit of nitrogen, available phosphoric acid, and soluble potash in commercial fertilizers in this state. If guarantees are as provided in §

2-7-3(8)(ii)

, the value shall be per unit of nitrogen, phosphorus, and potassium. The values so determined and published shall be used in determining and assessing penalties.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 168, § 2.

2-7-10.
Misbranding.

No person shall distribute misbranded fertilizer. A commercial fertilizer is deemed to be misbranded:

If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular;

If it is distributed under the name of another fertilizer product;

If it is not labeled as required in §

2-7-5

and in accordance with regulations prescribed under this chapter; or

If it purports to be or is represented as a commercial fertilizer or is represented as containing a plant nutrient or commercial fertilizer, unless the plant nutrient or commercial fertilizer conforms to the definition of identity, if any, prescribed
by regulation of the director; in the adopting of those regulations the director shall give due regard to commonly accepted definitions and official fertilizer terms as those issued by the association of American plant food control
officials.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 168, § 2.

2-7-11.
Adulteration.

No person shall distribute an adulterated fertilizer product. A commercial fertilizer is deemed to be adulterated:

If it contains any deleterious or harmful ingredient in sufficient amount to render it injurious to beneficial plant life when applied in accordance with directions for use on the label, or if adequate warning statements or directions for use, which may
be necessary to protect plant life, are not shown upon the label;

If its composition falls below or differs from that which it is purported to possess by its labeling;

If it contains unwanted crop seed or weed seed.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 168, § 2.

2-7-12.
Publications.

The director shall publish at least annually and in any form that the director may deem proper the results of analyses based on official samples of commercial fertilizers distributed within the state as compared with the analyses guaranteed under §§

2-7-4

and

2-7-5

.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 168, § 2.

2-7-13.
Rules and regulations.

The director is authorized to prescribe and, after a public hearing following public notice, to enforce any rules and regulations relating to investigational allowances, definitions, records, and the distribution of commercial fertilizers that may be
necessary to carry into effect the full intent and meaning of this chapter.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 168, § 2.

2-7-14.
Short weight.

If any commercial fertilizer in the possession of the consumer is found by the director to be short in weight, the registrant of that commercial fertilizer shall within thirty (30) days after official notice from the director pay to the consumer a penalty
equal to four (4) times the value of the actual shortage.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 168, § 2.

2-7-15.
Cancellation of registrations.

The director is authorized and empowered to cancel the registration of any brand of commercial fertilizer or to refuse to register any brand of commercial fertilizer as provided in this chapter, upon satisfactory evidence that the registrant has used
fraudulent or deceptive practices in the evasions or attempted evasions of the provisions of this chapter or any rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter. No registration shall be revoked or refused until the registrant
has been given the opportunity to appear for a hearing by the director.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 168, § 2.

2-7-16.
“Stop sale” orders.

The director may issue and enforce a written or printed “stop sale, use, or removal” order to the owner or custodian of any lot of commercial fertilizer and to hold at a designated place when the director finds the commercial fertilizer is being offered
or exposed for sale in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter until the law has been complied with and the commercial fertilizer is released in writing by the director, or the violation has been otherwise legally disposed
of by written authority. The director shall release the commercial fertilizer so withdrawn when the requirements of the provisions of this chapter have been complied with and all costs and expenses incurred in connection with the withdrawal
have been paid.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 168, § 2.

2-7-17.
Seizure, condemnation, and sale.

Any lot of commercial fertilizer not in compliance with the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to seizure on complaint of the director to a court of competent jurisdiction in the area in which the commercial fertilizer is located. In the event
the court finds the commercial fertilizer to be in violation of this chapter and orders the condemnation of the commercial fertilizer, it shall be disposed of in any manner consistent with the quality of the commercial fertilizer and
the laws of the state: provided, that in no instance shall the disposition of the commercial fertilizer be ordered by the court without first giving the claimant an opportunity to apply to the court for release of the commercial fertilizer
or for permission to process or relabel the commercial fertilizer to bring it into compliance with this chapter.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 168, § 2.

2-7-18.
Violations.

If it appears from the examination of any commercial fertilizer that any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules and regulations issued under this chapter have been violated, the director shall cause notice of the violations to be given to the
registrant, distributor, or possessor from whom the sample was taken; any person notified shall be given opportunity to be heard under any rules and regulations that may be prescribed by the director. If it appears after the hearing,
either in the presence or absence of the person so notified, that any of the provisions of this chapter or rules and regulations issued under this chapter have been violated, the director may certify the facts to the attorney general.

Any person convicted of violating any provision of this chapter or rules and regulations issued under this chapter shall be punished in the discretion of the court.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the director or the director’s representative to report for prosecution or for the institution of seizure proceedings as a result of minor violations of the chapter when the director believes that
the public interest will be best served by a suitable notice of warning in writing.

It is the duty of the attorney general to whom any violation is reported to cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted and prosecuted in a court of competent jurisdiction without delay.

The director is authorized to apply for and the court to grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated under the chapter
notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law. The injunction shall be issued without bond.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 168, § 2.

2-7-19.
Exchanges between manufacturers.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict or avoid sales or exchanges of commercial fertilizers to each other by importers, manufacturers, or manipulators who mix fertilizer materials for sale or as preventing the free and unrestricted shipments
of commercial fertilizer to manufacturers or manipulators who have registered their brands as required by the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 168, § 2.

2-7-20.
Constitutionality.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, or part of this chapter shall for any reason be judged invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, the judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of this chapter but shall be confined in its
operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, or part directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment has been rendered.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 168, § 2.

2-7-21 — 2-7-32.
Repealed.